District of Columbia statutes.
7-3008

Benefits.

(a)

APRA shall formulate guidelines that give priority for enrollment in the Program to any eligible minor, pregnant woman, or the parent, guardian, or other person who has legal custody of a minor.

(b)

(1)

A client with no dependent children shall receive a maximum of up to $20,000 per year, subject to the availability of funds in the Fund. A client with a dependent child shall receive a maximum of up to $40,000 per year, subject to the availability of funds in the Fund and the discretion of the Director of the Department of Health.

(2)

The Director of the Department of Health is authorized to increase the maximum amounts set forth in this subsection to adjust for inflation.

(c)

By waiver, approved by the Administrator of APRA, expenditures in excess of the maximum amounts stated in subsection (b) of this section may be authorized where good cause is shown.

(d)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create an entitlement to substance abuse treatment during any fiscal year if no funds remain available to the District government under a District or federal appropriation that has been enacted for the specific purpose of providing substance abuse treatment services.

History

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-146, § 9, 47 DCR 4350
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5031, 55 DCR 7598

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-219 rewrote subsec. (b), which had read as follows: “(b) A client with no dependent children shall receive a maximum of up to $10,000 per year, subject to the availability of funds in the Fund. A client with a dependent child or children shall receive a maximum of up to $25,000 per year, subject to the availability of funds in the Fund.”

Short Title

Short title: Section 5030 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle M of title V of the act may be cited as the “Choice in Drug Treatment Maximum Benefit Amendment Act of 2008”.